src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON PropZ1CZmorf !type KNR og KNR1
                           +Prop+Abs+Sg:%>-i              indholds-K   ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Abs+Sg:%>-             indholds-K   ;
                           +Prop+Abs+Sg:                 #            ;
                +Prop+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-ia             Krestr       ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-a            Krestr       ;
                +Prop+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-iat            Krestr       ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-at           Krestr       ;
                             +Prop+Rel+Sg:%>-ip             Krestr       ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>-p            Krestr       ;
                +Prop+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-iata           Krestr       ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-ata          Krestr       ;
                +Prop+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-iata           Krestr       ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-ata          Krestr       ;
                           +Prop+Lok+Sg:%>-imi            LokVb        ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>-mi           LokVb        ;
                +Prop+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-iani           LokVb        ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-ani          LokVb        ;
                +Prop+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-ianni          LokVb        ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-anni         LokVb        ;
                           +Prop+Ins+Sg:%>-imik           Krestr       ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>-mik          Krestr       ;
                           +Prop+Trm+Sg:%>-imut           TrmVb        ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>-mut          TrmVb        ;
                +Prop+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-ianut          TrmVb        ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-anut         TrmVb        ;
                +Prop+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-iannut         TrmVb        ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-annut        TrmVb        ;
                           +Prop+Abl+Sg:%>-imit           AblVb        ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>-mit          AblVb        ;
                           +Prop+Abl+Sg:%>-imiit          Krestr       ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>-miit         Krestr       ;
                           +Prop+Abl+Sg:%>-iminngaannit   AblVb        ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>-minngaannit  AblVb        ;
                +Prop+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-ianit          AblVb        ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>-anit         AblVb        ;
                +Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-iannit         AblVb        ;
        +Err/Sub+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>-annit        AblVb        ;
                           +Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>-itut           AeqVb       ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>-tut          AeqVb       ;
                           +Prop+Via+Sg:%>-ikkut          ZkkutZ       ;
                   +Err/Sub+Prop+Via+Sg:%>-kkut         ZkkutZ       ;
                      +Prop+U+Der/nv:%>-iu             IV_voq       ;
              +Prop+U+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-u            IV_voq       ;
              +Prop+U+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-ju            IV_voq       ;
               +Prop+KKUUTAAR+Der/nv:%>-ikkuutaar      flex-iv      ;
       +Prop+KKUUTAAR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-kkuutaar     flex-iv      ;
               +Prop+KKUUTAAR+Der/nv:%>-ikkuutaar      flex-tv      ;
       +Prop+KKUUTAAR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-kkuutaar     flex-tv      ;
               +Prop+KKUUTAAT+Der/nn:%>-ikkuutaat      tptmorf      ;
       +Prop+KKUUTAAT+Der/nn+Err/Sub:%>-kkuutaat     tptmorf      ;
                    +Prop+LIR+Der/nv:%>-iler           HTR_ir_GAQ_i ;
            +Prop+LIR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-ler          HTR_ir_GAQ_i ;
               +Prop+LLUINNAQ+Der/nv:%>-illuinnaq        tup-         ;
               +Prop+LLUINNAQ+Der/nv:%>-erluinnaq      tup-         ;
 +Prop+LLUINNAQ+Der/nv+NGAJAK+Der/nv:%>-erluinnangajak tup-         ;
                 +Prop+NGAJAK+Der/nn:%>-ingajak        tup-         ;
         +Prop+NGAJAK+Der/nn+Err/Sub:%>-ngajak       tup-         ;
                  +Prop+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>-inngor         IV_r         ;
          +Prop+NNGUR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-nngor        IV_r         ;
                  +Prop+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>-inngor         TV           ;
          +Prop+NNGUR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-inngor        TV           ;
                    +Prop+QAR+Der/nv:%>-eqar           IV_voq       ;
            +Prop+QAR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-qar          IV_voq       ;
                      +Prop+R+Der/nv:%>-er             XIirXmorf    ;
              +Prop+R+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-r            XIirXmorf    ;
                   +Prop+RAAR+Der/nv:%>-eraar          IV_r         ;
           +Prop+RAAR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-raar         IV_r         ;
                   +Prop+RIAR+Der/nv:%>-eriar          IV_r         ;
           +Prop+RIAR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-riar         IV_r         ;
                   +Prop+RIAR+Der/nv:%>-eriar          TV           ;
           +Prop+RIAR+Der/nv+Err/Sub:%>-riar         TV           ;
                  +Prop+RIAAT+Der/nn:%>-eriaat         tptmorf      ;
          +Prop+RIAAT+Der/nn+Err/Sub:%>-riaat        tptmorf      ;
                +Prop+VVAARIK+Der/nn:%>-iffaarik       tup-         ;
        +Prop+VVAARIK+Der/nn+Err/Sub:%>-ffaarik      tup-         ;

!LEXICON attribut_til_prop  !!= * @CODE@
!+Sem/FirstName+Prop:%>	Krestr ;

!LEXICON Z2+lateqZ	!Amaalik:Amaa
!! :- Z2-ateqZ-suf ;     !SUB
!    Z2-ateqZ-suf ;     !SUB
!    
!LEXICON Z2+lateqZ-suf   !SUB
!+Sem/Hum+Sem/FirstName+Prop: # ; !Z2ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg:%>lik Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss:%>liutiga	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss:%>liutit	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>liutaa	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss:%>liutini	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>liuterput	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>littarput	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>liutersi	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>littarsi	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>liutaat	Krestr ;!Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>liutaat	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>liuutertik	Krestr ;!Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>littartik	Krestr ;!Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>llip	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>llup	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>liup	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss:%>liutima	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss:%>liutivit	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>liutaata	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+4SgPoss:%>liutimi	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>liutitta	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>littatta	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%>liutissi	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%>littassi	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>liutaata	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>littaata	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>liutimik	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>littamik	Krestr ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>limmut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:%>liutinnut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>liutinnut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>liutaanut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss:%>liutiminut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>liutitsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>littatsinnut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>liutissinnut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
!+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>littassinnut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>liutaannut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ
!+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>littaannut	TrmVb ; !Z2-ateqZ 
