src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ateq
KNR PropZ1CZmorf ; !Nyt lex til prop på udlydende C, der behøver bindestreg
KNR1 PropZ1CZmorf ; !Nyt lex til prop på udlydende C, der behøver bindestreg
KNR-TV	PropZ1CZmorf ;
